West Virginia, session 2026, HB4199.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5C. MINIMUM WAGE AND MAXIMUM HOURS STANDARDS FOR EMPLOYEES. §21-5C-4. Credits. Prior to January 1, 2015, in determining whether an employer is paying an employee wages and overtime compensation as provided in sections two and three of this article, there shall be provided in accordance with the regulations which shall be promulgated by the commissioner a credit to the employer of twenty percent of the hourly rate of the amount paid an employee customarily receiving gratuities, and a reasonable credit for board and lodging furnished to an employee: Provided, That after December 31, 2014, in When determining whether an employer is paying an employee wages and overtime compensation as provided in sections two and three of this article, there shall be provided in accordance with the legislative rules proposed for promulgation by the commissioner a credit to the employer of up to 70 percent of the hourly rate of the amount paid an employee customarily receiving gratuities, and a reasonable credit for board and lodging furnished to an employee: Provided, That an employer may take this credit up to 70 percent of the minimum wage for all hours worked, contingent on the employee receiving pay and gratuities for each hour worked, equal to or above the current minimum wage. The commissioner shall propose legislative rules for promulgation relating to maximum allowances to employers for room and board furnished to employees: Provided, however, That the employer shall be required to furnish to the commissioner upon request, documentary evidence that the employee is receiving at least seventy percent of the minimum wage in gratuities or is receiving room and lodging in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner.